Hawaii statutes.
§339D-3 Sales prohibition. (a)
Beginning January 1, 2010, no electronic device manufacturer or retailer
shall sell or offer for sale any new covered electronic device for delivery in
this State unless:

(1) The covered electronic device is labeled with a
brand, and the label is permanently affixed and readily visible; and

(2) The brand is included in a registration that is
filed with the department and that is effective pursuant to section
339D-4(b)(3).

(b) Beginning April 1, 2009, the department
shall maintain a list of each registered electronic device manufacturer and the
brands reported in each electronic device manufacturer's registration and a
list of brands for which no electronic device manufacturer has registered. The
lists shall be posted on the department website and shall be updated by the
first day of each month. Each retailer who sells or offers for sale any new
covered electronic device for delivery in this State shall review these lists
prior to selling the covered electronic device. A retailer is considered to
have complied with subsection (a) if, on the date a new covered electronic
device was ordered by the retailer, the brand was included on the department's
list of brands reported in an electronic device manufacturer's registration. [L
Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next